Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.060

Condemnation of infected property—Notice to owner—Division into classes.

Said notice of condemnation shall also grant permission to the owner or person in charge of infected fruit, vegetables, or nursery stock to divide the same into classes:

(1) The portion not infected;

(2) The infected portion which is capable of successful disinfection; and

(3) The infected portion which is incapable of successful disinfection and must be destroyed.

Said notice shall require the owner or person to disinfect class (2) and destroy class (3) within the time stated.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.08.060. Prior: 1943 c 150 s 4, part; 1929 c 150 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 108 s 1, part; 1919 c 195 s 2 1/2, part; 1915 c 166 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 2848, part.]